Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-112
Allegations set forth in indictment or information; burden of proof.

The allegations stating that the underlying offense was committed because of the person's race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, or disability or because of the person's association with a person of a certain race, color, religion, ancestry, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, or disability shall be set forth in the indictment or information. It is the burden of the prosecuting attorney to prove such allegations beyond a reasonable doubt to the judge or jury in the state's case in chief.

Laws 1997, LB 90, § 4;

Laws 2004, LB 270, § 1.